Louisiana, session 2026, HB6.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. It is the intent of this legislature to allow the Rapides Parish Police Jury
to prohibit the permitting of carbon dioxide injection wells, the geologic sequestration of
carbon dioxide, and the transportation of carbon dioxide by pipeline within Rapides Parish.
The Rapides Parish Police Jury adopted a resolution on December 8, 2025, stating that it
supports legislation authorizing local determinations on whether carbon dioxide
sequestration activities should be allowed within the parish.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-113 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 6
Section 2. R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(c), 1104(F), and 1104.3 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(17)
* * *
(c) The secretary's authority pursuant to this Paragraph shall be subject to the
local option procedures set forth in Chapter 11 of this Subtitle.
* * *
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary
shall not issue any order, permit, or certificate authorizing Class VI injection wells,
carbon dioxide sequestration, or the transportation of carbon dioxide through
pipelines in any parish where prohibited pursuant to the local option procedure set
forth in this Chapter.
(2) The prohibition in this Subsection shall prevent the final issuance of any
order, permit, or certificate, regardless of whether an application for same was
previously submitted to the department.
* * *
§1104.3. Local option; Rapides Parish
A. In the exercise of the parish's police power to protect public health, safety,
and welfare and authority to regulate land use within its borders, the governing
authority of Rapides Parish may, by resolution or ordinance, determine whether
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-113 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 6
Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, and pipelines transporting
carbon dioxide may be located within the parish.
B. A copy of any resolution or ordinance passed for this purpose shall be
provided to the department by the governing authority of Rapides Parish.
C. Any prohibition adopted pursuant to this Section shall become effective
upon adoption of the resolution or ordinance by the governing authority of Rapides
Parish.
D. Any local determination made pursuant to this Section shall supersede
and preempt any conflicting state or local law, regulation, order, permit, or
certificate. No application, option agreement, site control agreement, or preliminary
or draft approval shall confer vested rights or grandfathered authority inconsistent
with a parish prohibition adopted pursuant to this Section.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.